Hawaii statutes.
[§531B-8] Right to rely on
representations. (a) Any person signing a funeral service agreement,
cremation authorization form, or any other authorization for disposition shall
be deemed to warrant the truthfulness of any facts set forth therein, including
the identity of the decedent whose remains are to be buried, cremated, or otherwise
disposed of, and the party's authority to order the disposition.

(b) A funeral establishment, cemetery,
mortuary, or crematory shall have the right to rely on the funeral service
agreement, cremation authorization form, or any other authorization form,
including the identification of the decedent, and shall have the authority to
carry out the instructions of the person or persons whom the funeral
establishment, cemetery, mortuary, or crematory reasonably believes to hold the
right of disposition.

(c) The funeral establishment, cemetery,
mortuary, or crematory shall have no responsibility to verify the identity of
the decedent or contact or independently investigate the existence of any
person who may have a right of disposition. If there is more than one person
in the same priority class pursuant to section 531B-4 and the funeral
establishment, cemetery, mortuary, or crematory has no knowledge of any
objection by other members of the priority class, it may rely on and act
according to the instructions of the first person in the priority class to make
funeral and disposition arrangements; provided that no other person in the
priority class provides written notice to the funeral establishment, cemetery,
mortuary, or crematory of that person's objections. [L 2013, c 17, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next